cv_RU/cv_RU.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY -еӗаӑсҫоитнрвйлпкьыяуӳдмзшбчгщюжцёхфэъАӐВСҪМКГПТЕИЛФНДОӖЭРЗЮЯБХЖШЦӲУЧЬЫЪЩЙЁ

SFX P N 30
SFX P ем ен .
SFX P ем енех .
SFX P ем енччӗ .
SFX P ем ене .
SFX P ем енеччӗ .
SFX P ем енче .
SFX P ем енчех .
SFX P ем енчеччӗ .
SFX P ем енчен .
SFX P ем енченех .
SFX P 0 пе .
SFX P 0 пех .
SFX P 0 печчӗ .
SFX P 0 пеле .
SFX P 0 пелех .
SFX P 0 пелеччӗ .
SFX P 0 пелен .
SFX P 0 пеленех .
SFX P 0 пеленччӗ .
SFX P 0 сӗр .
SFX P 0 сӗрех .
SFX P 0 сӗрччӗ .
SFX P 0 шӗн .
SFX P 0 шӗнех .
SFX P 0 шӗнччӗ .
SFX P ем енчи .
SFX P ем енчиччӗ .
SFX P ем енчиех .
SFX P 0 ех .
SFX P 0 ччӗ .

SFX R N 5
SFX R 0 ччӗ [вйлмнр]
SFX R 0 чӗ [кпсҫтхчш]
SFX R 0 ччӗ [вйлмнр][еиӗӳауӑюя]
SFX R 0 чӗ [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][кпсҫтхчш][еиӗӳауӑюя]
SFX R 0 ччӗ [аеиуӗӑӳэюя][кпсҫтхчш][еиӗӳауӑюя]

SFX S N 4
SFX S 0 ах [^аӑу]
SFX S 0 х а
SFX S ӑ ах ӑ
SFX S у ӑвах у

SFX T N 4
SFX T 0 ех [^ӳӗе]
SFX T 0 х а
SFX T ӗ ех ӗ
SFX T у ӗвех ӳ
